New York, session 2025-2026, A7159.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. (a) The commissioner of education is hereby directed to 2 establish a pilot program aimed at improving social and emotional learn- 3 ing. Each school system or district in the state shall participate by 4 establishing such pilot program in at least one school within their 5 system or district. Each school system or district shall establish such 6 pilot program within twelve months of the effective date of this act. 7 (b) The program shall be administered through a contract with outside 8 entities that have been identified by the commissioner of education as a 9 community based organization that: 10 (1) utilizes a social and emotional learning curriculum that: (i) has 11 already been successfully tested in rural and urban schools within the 12 state, (ii) includes a volunteerism component, (iii) is listed in the 13 United States Department of Education's What Works Clearinghouse, (iv) 14 has high ratings from the Collaborative for Academic, Social, and 15 Emotional Learning, the National Institute on Drug Abuse, The Center for 16 Substance Abuse Prevention and The National Registry of Evidence-based 17 Programs and Practices and (v) has specific plans targeting prekinder- 18 garten through twelfth grade, that can be incorporated into other estab- 19 lished subject lesson plans or be its own standalone lesson plan; 20 (2) utilizes social influence and social cognitive approaches in 21 developing social-emotional competencies, citizenship skills, positive EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08955-01-5 A. 7159 2 1 character, skills and attitudes consistent with a drug-free lifestyle, 2 and service to others within a caring and consistent environment; 3 (3) utilizes a learning model which employs inquiry, presentation, 4 discussion, group work, guided practice, service-learning, and 5 reflection to accomplish the desired outcomes; 6 (4) has prior experience with New York state teachers and staff 7 professional development; and 8 (5) is supported by community based organizations and volunteer 9 service organizations. 10 (c) The department of education shall conduct an evaluation of the 11 pilot program and shall submit a final report by July 15, 2029 to the 12 governor and the legislature. 13 § 2. Funding for the social and emotional learning pilot program shall 14 be provided through appropriations to the department of education. 15 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 16 this act shall expire and be deemed repealed August 1, 2029.